Massachusetts, session 194th, H3520.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 40 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting 
2 after section 1B the following section:- 
3  Section 1C. “Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform”, software or a combination of 
4 software that automates plan review, automatically produces code-compliant approvals, accepts 
5 online payments for permitting fees if permitting fees are levied, and instantly issues permits and 
6 permit revisions for residential photovoltaic systems upon online submission of permitting fee 
7 payments, if permitting fees are levied, and a code-compliant application. The Smart Residential 
8 Solar Permitting Platform shall be available for solar photovoltaic systems up to the maximum 
9 capacity allowed with a 200-amp main service disconnect that provides electrical power to a one- 
10 or two-family dwelling, and that may include an energy storage system, a main panel upgrade, or 
11 a main breaker derate. 

2 of 11 12  SECTION 2. Said chapter 40 is hereby amended by inserting after section 69 the 
13 following sections:- 
14  Section 70.  
15  (a) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Permit Granting Authority shall allow for electronic 
16 submission of the permit application and associated documentation for the installation of a 
17 residential solar photovoltaic system, that may include an energy storage system, a main panel 
18 upgrade, and/or a main breaker derate. All required permitting documentation and forms shall be 
19 published on the Permit Granting Authority’s publicly accessible internet website. The Permit 
20 Granting Authority shall authorize an electronic signature for the permit application and other 
21 documentation in lieu of a wet signature by an applicant. Electronic submission, including online 
22 payment of associated permitting fees, shall be offered through either an online portal available 
23 on the website of the Permit Granting Authority or via electronic mail to a dedicated account that 
24 shall be capable of receiving permit applications. 
25  (b) Upon submission of required permit application documents, the application shall be 
26 deemed complete if, after five business days have elapsed, the Permit Granting Authority has not 
27 issued a written correction notice detailing all deficiencies in the application and identifying 
28 additional information explicitly necessary for the Permit Granting Authority to complete a 
29 review. 
30  (c) An application shall be deemed approved and the applicant may begin installation if 
31 ten business days after the application was deemed complete has elapsed and the following are 
32 true: 
33  (1) the Permit Granting Authority has not administratively approved the application. 

3 of 11 34  (2) the Permit Granting Authority has not denied the permit. 
35  (e) A Permit Granting Authority may use a Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform 
36 to satisfy the requirements of this section. An applicant may begin installation after the issuance 
37 of a permit from the platform. 
38  Section 71.  
39  (a) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Permit Granting Authority for a municipality with a 
40 population greater than 5,000 people, that is not exempt pursuant to paragraph (f), shall 
41 implement a Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform. The Permit Granting Authority shall 
42 anticipate that the Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform will have the capability to process 
43 at least 75 percent of residential solar applications on existing construction submitted to 
44 municipalities in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. 
45  (b) Municipalities that adopt a Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform pursuant to 
46 subsection (a) shall, for a solar photovoltaic system approved by such a platform, not require 
47 manual review at any time during the permitting and inspection processes, including but not 
48 limited to, before issuing a permit or before conducting or finalizing the inspection. 
49  (c) Subsection (b) does not preclude an inspector from examining construction 
50 documents. 
51  (d) (1) Municipalities shall submit compliance reports to the Massachusetts Department 
52 of Energy Resources when the municipality is in compliance with subsection (a). The reports 
53 shall be submitted within 60 days of the municipality becoming compliant with subsection (a). 
54 The Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources may set guidelines for these reports. 

4 of 11 55  (2) If the municipality has a resolution or ordinance in effect pursuant to subsection (f), 
56 the report shall include the resolution or ordinance. 
57  (3) If the municipality does not have a resolution or ordinance in effect pursuant to 
58 subsection (f), the report shall include: 
59  (i) Date of compliance; 
60  (ii) Software used for compliance; 
61  (iii) Confirmation that the municipality is: 
62  (A) using a Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform to issue permits instantly and 
63 issue permit revisions instantly for residential solar photovoltaic systems; and 
64  (B) not requiring manual review at any time during the permitting and inspection 
65 processes, including but not limited to, before issuing a permit or before conducting or finalizing 
66 the inspection for solar photovoltaic systems approved by the Smart Residential Solar Permitting 
67 Platform. 
68  (iv) Explanation for why the municipality anticipates the Smart Residential Solar 
69 Permitting Platform has the capability to process at least 75 percent of the residential solar 
70 photovoltaic permit applications on existing construction submitted to municipalities in the 
71 commonwealth. 
72  (A)Municipalities may provide explanations that are based on, but are not necessarily 
73 limited to, statements from the provider of the Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform. 

5 of 11 74  (4) The Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources may determine if the 
75 municipality’s report of compliance is accurate, may make the findings publicly available, and 
76 may take action at the Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources’ discretion to encourage 
77 and enforce compliance with subsection (a). 
78  (e) (1) Municipalities shall submit annual reports to the Massachusetts Department of 
79 Energy Resources on the usage of the Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform. 
80 Municipalities shall annually report to the Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources by 
81 April 1st each year, covering the previous calendar year, starting on April 1, 2028. This annual 
82 reporting requirement shall become inoperative on April 2, 2037. The Massachusetts Department 
83 of Energy Resources may set guidelines for these reports. 
84  (2) If the municipality has a resolution or ordinance in effect pursuant to subparagraph 
85 (f), the report shall include the resolution or ordinance. 
86  (3) If the municipality does not have a resolution or ordinance in effect pursuant to 
87 subparagraph (f), the report shall include: 
88  (i) Number of permits issued through the Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform 
89 and relevant characteristics of those systems; 
90  (ii) Number of residential photovoltaic solar permits issued by means other than the 
91 Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform and relevant characteristics of those systems; 
92  (iii) Software used for compliance; 
93  (iv) Confirmation that the municipality is: 

6 of 11 94  (A) using a Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform to issue permits instantly and 
95 issue permit revisions instantly for residential solar photovoltaic systems; and 
96  (B) not requiring manual review at any time during the permitting and inspection 
97 processes, including but not limited to, before issuing a permit or before conducting or finalizing 
98 the inspection for permits and permit revisions issued by the Smart Residential Solar Permitting 
99 Platform. 
100  (v) Plan to increase usage of the Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform if fewer 
101 than 75 percent of residential solar photovoltaic permits are issued through the Smart Residential 
102 Solar Permitting Platform on existing construction. 
103  (4) The Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources may determine if the 
104 municipality’s report of compliance is accurate, may make the findings publicly available, and 
105 may take action at the Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources’ discretion to encourage 
106 and enforce compliance with subsection (a). 
107  (f) (1) The Permit Granting Authority for a municipality with a population greater than 
108 5,000 people is exempt from paragraph (a) if the aforementioned municipality makes a written 
109 finding and adopts a resolution or ordinance. The resolution or ordinance shall stay in effect for 
110 no more than one year. Within the last three months of the effective end date for the resolution or 
111 ordinance, the municipality may adopt an additional resolution or ordinance to extend the 
112 exemption from paragraph (a) for an additional year. The municipality may continue to adopt 
113 resolutions or ordinances extending the exemption for an additional year so long as each 
114 resolution or ordinance is adopted within the last three months of the effective end date of the 
115 resolution or ordinance. 

7 of 11 116  (2) Each resolution or ordinance adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall include both 
117 of the following: 
118  (i) A determination that the Permit Granting Authority is unable to adopt a Smart 
119 Residential Solar Permitting Platform due to unique technical, climactic, geological, 
120 seismological, or topographical conditions, including a description of those unique conditions. 
121  (ii) A plan for the Permit Granting Authority to approve all residential photovoltaic 
122 permit applications or issue a written correction notice within five business days. The plan shall 
123 include the time it has taken for the Permit Granting Authority to approve residential 
124 photovoltaic permit applications or issue written correction notices in the past year, and, if the 
125 Permit Granting Authority has previously taken more than five business days to approve a 
126 residential solar photovolatic permit application or issue a written correction notice in the past 
127 year, an explanation of how the plan would address the delays. 
128  (g) A municipality shall self-certify its compliance with this section when applying for 
129 funding from the Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources after the applicable date in 
130 subdivision (a). Municipalities that fail to comply with this section may be ineligible for funding 
131 opportunities offered by the Massachusetts Department of Energy Resources. The Massachusetts 
132 Department of Energy Resources may, at its sole discretion, condition or deny a municipality or 
133 county direct funding from any of its programs if the municipality is not in compliance with this 
134 section. 
135  Section 71.  
136  (a) On or before July 1, 2027, municipalities with a population of more than 5,000 
137 residents shall provide an option for remote inspections via recorded video or photo that can be 

8 of 11 138 submitted electronically for projects permitted by the Smart Residential Solar Permitting 
139 Platform. These inspections shall be offered at no greater cost, and shall be available with no 
140 greater delay, than in-person inspections. 
141  (b) Municipalities shall require no more than one inspection for projects permitted by the 
142 Smart Residential Solar Permitting Platform unless the first inspection was failed. 
143  (c) An electric distribution company shall not require inspections additional to the 
144 inspection performed by the Permit Granting Authority by the electric distribution company or 
145 any other entity as a precondition to granting the customer permission to operate. 
146  SECTION 3. Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
147 Official Edition, is hereby amended by by striking out subsection (d) and inserting in place 
148 thereof the following subsection:-  
149  (d) any owner or tenant of residential property located in the commonwealth who is not a 
150 dependent of another taxpayer and who occupies said property as his principal residence, shall be 
151 allowed a credit equal to 15 per cent of the net expenditure for a renewable energy source 
152 property or seven thousand five hundred dollars, whichever is lesser; provided, however, that in 
153 the case of a newly constructed residence the credit shall be available to the original 
154 owner/occupant. Any taxpayer entitled to this credit for any taxable year, the amount of which 
155 exceeds his total tax due for the then current taxable year, may carry over the excess amount, as 
156 reduced from year to year, and apply it to his tax liability for any one or more of the next 
157 succeeding three taxable years; provided, however, that in no taxable year may the amount of the 
158 credit allowed exceed the total tax due of the taxpayer for the relevant taxable year. For taxable 
159 years beginning on or after January first, two thousand twenty-seven, if the amount of the credit 

9 of 11 160 allowable under this subsection shall exceed the taxpayer's tax liability for such year, and the 
161 taxpayer meets the definition of low to moderate income, as defined in section 38d of chapter 
162 121b in the general laws, or resides in an environmental justice population, as defined in section 
163 62 of chapter 30 of the general laws, the excess shall be treated as an overpayment of tax to be 
164 credited or refunded, provided, however, that no interest shall be paid thereon. Joint owners of a 
165 residential property shall share any credit available to the property under this subsection in the 
166 same proportion as their ownership interest. 
167  SECTION 4. Section 6 of chapter 25A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
168 amended inserting after subsection (14) the following subsection:- 
169  (15) develop and promulgate, in consultation with the state board of building regulation 
170 and standards, the department of transportation, and local zoning and planning boards, a 
171 requirement that parking lots 16,000 square feet or larger which are constructed or significantly 
172 renovated on or after January 1, 2028 must install a solar canopy. The department may establish 
173 exemption criteria from the requirements of this section. Such criteria may include insufficient 
174 solar energy generating potential and the installation of a solar energy system elsewhere on the 
175 property. The department may allow exemptions from the requirements of this section for 
176 affordable housing developments, after consulting with affordable housing developers and 
177 operators, community development corporations, organizations that represent affordable housing 
178 residents, and other stakeholders. 
179  SECTION 5. Chapter 164 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
180 section 1K the following section:-  
181  Section 1L.  

10 of 11 182  (1) For the purposes of climate resiliency and mitigation, reliability, and encouragement 
183 of installation of distributed electricity generation and storage capacity, no right to exclusive 
184 service or franchise established within Section 1B or elsewhere in this chapter shall prevent a 
185 municipality, or agencies of the commonwealth or private electric customers in coordination 
186 with a municipality, within an electric or gas company’s service territory, from: 
187  (i) establishing an energy microgrid or district energy system; 
188  (ii) sharing electric generation or storage resources among facilities that are contiguous 
189 and owned by the same utility customer, irrespective of the number of electric meters installed at 
190 such facilities; or 
191  (iii) using public rights of way to conduct electrical conduit or other energy resources 
192 point to point where the municipality deems there is benefit from sharing energy resources. 
193  SECTION 6. Chapter 164 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
194 section 142, as so appearing, the following new section:- 
195  Section 142A.  
196  (1) The Department shall direct each electric distribution company to update their 
197 interconnection tariff to require a process to determine whether a project application being 
198 considered for interconnection within a Group Study has sufficient available hosting capacity 
199 when considered as an individual project, and to grant Interconnection Service Agreements to 
200 those projects with sufficient hosting capacity. 
201  (2) An inverter-based generating facility with a generating capacity of 25 kW or less shall 
202 be allowed to apply for interconnection under the simplified interconnection process established 

11 of 11 203 by the Department. The Department shall direct the distribution companies to file updated tariffs 
204 no later than 180 days after this act is enacted. The distribution companies shall impose no study 
205 or transformer fees for behind-the-meter simplified interconnection applications of less than 25 
206 kilowatts. 
207  (3) The Department shall develop, in consultation with the electric distribution 
208 companies, a common application for interconnection to the distribution grid, regardless of 
209 compensation type or program. 
210  SECTION 7. Section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
211 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (dd) and inserting in place thereof 
212 the following subsection:- 
213  (dd) Sales of equipment directly relating to any solar, energy storage, windpowered; or 
214 heat pump system, which is being utilized as a primary or auxiliary power system for the purpose 
215 of heating or otherwise supplying energy needs in the commonwealth. 
216  SECTION 8. Section 139 of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
217 amended by striking out, in lines 137 and 138, the words, “that are not net metering facilities of a 
218 municipality or other governmental entity.” 
219  SECTION 9. Said section 139 of said chapter 164, as so appearing, is hereby further 
220 amended by striking out, in lines 145 and 146, the words, “in the second sentence by striking the 
221 words “that are not net metering facilities of a municipality or other governmental entity.”